Washington statutes.
RCW 36.150.080

Transfer of county ferry district real and personal property—Assumption of appropriations and federal grants.

(1) When the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a county ferry district are transferred pursuant to this chapter, all real and personal property owned by the county ferry district becomes that of the county.

(2) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or other writings relating to the administration of the powers, duties, and functions transferred pursuant to this chapter and available to the county ferry district must be made available to the county.

(3) All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed in carrying out the rights, powers, functions, and obligations transferred under this chapter and available to the county ferry district must be made available to the county.

(4) All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with powers, duties, and functions transferred under this chapter must be assigned to the county.

(5) Any appropriations or federal grant made to the county ferry district for the purpose of carrying out the rights, powers, functions, and obligations authorized to be assumed by a county pursuant to this chapter, on the effective date of such transfer, must be credited to the county for the purpose of carrying out such transferred rights, powers, functions, and obligations.

[ 2014 c 51 s 8.]